Washington statutes.
RCW 43.270.040

Coordinated strategies.

This grant program will be available to communities of any geographic size but will encourage and reward communities which develop coordinated or complimentary strategies within geographic areas such as county areas or groups of county areas which correspond to units of government with significant responsibilities in the area of substance abuse, existing coalitions, or other entities important to the success of a community's strategy against substance abuse.

[ 1989 c 271 s 318.]